South Dakota, session 2026, SB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 12-18-16.1 be AMENDED:
12-18-16.1. If an optical scan ballot is used, the person in charge of the election
must:
(1) Provide a black ink pen for each in-person voter to mark the voter's choice on the
ballot; and
(2) Provide instructions to each voter who applies to vote by absentee ballot that the
voter use a black ink pen to mark the voter's choice on the ballot.
The person in charge of the election may not disqualify any ballot marked by a
writing instrument other than a black ink pen.

26.759.11 2 177
An Act to clarify the requirements for marking an optical scan ballot.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 177
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 177 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB177 ENROLLED